Hawaii statutes.
§712-1247 Promoting a detrimental drug in
the first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting a
detrimental drug in the first degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Possesses four hundred or more capsules or
tablets containing one or more of the Schedule V substances;

(b) Possesses one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of one ounce or more, containing
one or more of the Schedule V substances;

(c) Distributes fifty or more capsules or tablets
containing one or more of the Schedule V substances;

(d) Distributes one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of one- eighth ounce or more,
containing one or more of the Schedule V substances;

(e) Possesses one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of one pound or more, containing
any marijuana;

(f) Distributes one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of one ounce or more, containing
any marijuana;

(g) Possesses, cultivates, or has under the person's
control twenty-five or more marijuana plants; or

(h) Sells or barters any marijuana or any Schedule V
substance in any amount.

(2) Promoting a detrimental drug in the first
degree is a class C felony.

(3) Any marijuana seized as evidence of a
violation of this section in excess of one pound may be destroyed after it has
been photographed and the weight thereof recorded. The remainder of the
marijuana shall remain in the custody of the police department until the
termination of any criminal action brought as a result of the seizure of the
marijuana. Photographs duly identified as accurately representing the
marijuana shall be deemed competent evidence of the marijuana involved and shall
be admissible in any proceeding, hearing, or trial to the same extent as the
marijuana itself; provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to limit or to restrict the application of rule 901 of the Hawaii rules of evidence.
[L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 163, §6(i); am L 1981, c 31, §3 and c 123,
§1; am L 1986, c 314, §75; am L 1989, c 384, §2]

Revision Note

In subsection (1)(a) to (f), "or" deleted pursuant
to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Criminalization of marijuana is constitutional. 56 H. 501,
542 P.2d 366 (1975).

Where a bill of particulars, under a charge of distributing
marijuana, states that defendant "offered or agreed to sell"
marijuana, State is limited to proving the particulars specified in the bill,
notwithstanding the definition of "distribute" contained in §712-1240(1).
60 H. 8, 586 P.2d 1022 (1978).

Where violation of misdemeanor offense under §712-1247(1)(d)
also constituted violation of felony offense under subsection (1)(h),
conviction of felony offense would have constituted violation of defendant's
due process and equal protection rights. 86 H. 48, 947 P.2d 360 (1997).

Procuring agent for the buyer defense was available against a
charge of bartering a drug and was available to a defendant who was buyer's
accomplice. 78 H. 488 (App.), 896 P.2d 944 (1995).

Since to sell and to barter do not include to prescribe,
§712-1248(1)(d) is not a lesser included offense of §712-1247(1)(h). 78 H. 488
(App.), 896 P.2d 944 (1995).

Where a Hawaii county ordinance made the enforcement of
marijuana laws the lowest enforcement priority in the county, the ordinance was
preempted by state laws governing the investigation and prosecution of alleged
violations of the Hawaii Penal Code concerning the adult personal use of cannabis.
132 H. 511 (App.), 323 P.3d 155 (2014).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next